Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-462
Superior commissioned officer; assaulting; willfully disobeying.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Strikes his superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against him while he is in the execution of his office; or

(2) Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his superior commissioned officer, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 62, p. 1576.